Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2534.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 459.102, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 4. âAnimalâ means cattle, swine, horses, sheep, chickens, turkeys, or fish , or shellfish . Sec. 2. Section 459.102, subsection 7, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new paragraphs: NEW PARAGRAPH . n. Shellfish weighing twenty-five grams or more . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.001 NEW PARAGRAPH . o. Shellfish weighing less than twenty-five grams . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.00006 Sec. 3. Section 459.320, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 459.320 Exception from regulation ââ election for confinement feeding operations confining fish or shellfish . House File 2534, p. 2 A person who exclusively confines fish or shellfish as part of a confinement feeding operation may elect to comply with the permitting requirements of section 455B.183 in lieu of the permitting requirements of this subchapter . ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2534, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor